test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vinnjooh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - vinnjooh: # 1B
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Nom: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Gen: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Acc: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Ill: vinjohân
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Loc: vinjohist
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Com: vinjoháin
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Abe: vinnjoohttáá
    vinnjooh+N+Ess:    vinjohin
    vinnjooh+N+Par:    vinjohid
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Nom: vinjoheh
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Gen: vinjohij
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Acc: vinjohijd
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Ill: vinjoháid
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Loc: vinjohijn
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Com: vinjohijguin
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Abe: vinjohijttáá
